New Jersey, session 222, A4242.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1976, c.100 (C.2A:42-6.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A person to whom rent is due and payable [on the first of the] each month upon a lease or other agreement shall allow a period of five business days grace in which the rent due by a qualified tenant shall be paid.  No delinquency or other late charge shall be made which includes the period before the expiration of the grace period of five business days. b.    For any month in which rent is due and payable, the grace period shall not commence before the date on which the qualified tenant receives payment of public assistance.  If the qualified tenant receives multiple payments of public assistance during any month for which rent is due and payable, the grace period shall not commence before the date on which the qualified tenant receives the final payment of public assistance.  The lease or other agreement of the qualified tenant shall set forth the dates on which the qualified tenant is scheduled to receive public assistance during any month for which rent is due and payable. c.     As used in this section [, "business] : "Business day" means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or State or federal holiday. "Public assistance" means payments received pursuant to Social Security Old Age Pensions, Railroad Retirement Pensions, other governmental pensions in lieu of Social Security Old Age Pensions, Social Security Disability Benefits, Supplemental Security Income, or Work First New Jersey. "Qualified tenant" includes any recipient of public assistance. (cf: P.L.2001, c.142, s.1) 2.    Section 3 of P.L.1976, c.100 (C.2A:42-6.3) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day after enactment and shall apply to any lease or other agreement that is entered into, or renewed, on or after that date.